California, session 20252026, AB2456.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 68705 is added to the Government Code, to read:68705. Courts may display on their public internet website information that the Commission on Judicial Performance prepares and provides that clearly and concisely presents the Commission on Judicial Performance’s mission, its processes for submitting a complaint, and information about what constitutes a violation of the Code of Judicial Ethics.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact subsequent legislation related to vehicle accidents.